Hawaii statutes.
[§347-2.5] Service dog, defined. As
used in this chapter, "service dog" means any dog that is
individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an
individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory, intellectual, or
other mental disability. A companion or comfort animal is not a service dog
unless it meets the requirements of this definition and it accompanies a person
for the purpose of performing the work or tasks for which it has been trained.
[L 2011, c 175, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next